Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,185.03
Remedial action plan; completion; duties; enforceability.

(1) Within sixty days after completion of a voluntary remedial action plan approved pursuant to section 81-15,185, the applicant shall provide the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment with a final remedial action report and assurance that the plan has been fully implemented. Department approval of a voluntary remedial action plan shall be void upon failure to comply with the approved plan or willful submission of false, inaccurate, or misleading information by the applicant.

(2) Voluntary remedial action plans approved under section 81-15,185 are not enforceable unless the department can demonstrate that the applicant has failed to fully implement the approved plan. The department may require further action if such action is authorized by other state statutes administered by the department.

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 144;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 434.